Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1841YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 220 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0r. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 280.13D relating to the participation 4 in high school extracurricular interscholastic athletic 5 contests or competitions by students enrolled in grade eight in 6 the same manner as a school district. 7 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 10 requirements of section 280.13D relating to the participation 11 in high school extracurricular interscholastic athletic 12 contests or competitions by students enrolled in grade eight in 13 the same manner as a school district. 14 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 280.13D Participation in 15 extracurricular interscholastic athletic contests or competitions 16 ââ students enrolled in grade eight. 17 The board of directors of a school district and the 18 authorities in charge of a nonpublic school shall allow 19 students enrolled in grade eight who meet academic standards 20 established by the school district or nonpublic school to 21 participate in any extracurricular interscholastic athletic 22 contest or competition that is provided by the school district 23 or nonpublic school to students who are enrolled in grades nine 24 through twelve. 25